Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Pre-Session Preparation of Requests

48.030.
Preparation of branch budget recommendations — Legislative assistance to judicial branch.

Each branch of government, during the preparation of its budget recommendation and before its submission to the General Assembly, shall examine its statements and estimates and shall make or cause to be made such further investigations with such hearings as deemed advisable, and shall direct such changes or revisions as warranted.

Upon request, the Legislative Research Commission shall assist the judicial branch in the preparation of its budget.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 3, effective July 1, 1983.

48.040.
Budget forms — Projections of actuarially required contribution rates — Executive branch assistance in preparation of budgets.

On or before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, representatives designated by the Governor, the Chief Justice and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches shall propose drafts of uniform forms to be used by all budget units in submitting their budget estimates, requests and recommendations, and shall recommend to the Legislative Research Commission such rules and regulations deemed necessary for the preparation of such budget estimates, requests and recommendations.

On or before July 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Legislative Research Commission shall prescribe uniform forms, records, and instructions to be used by branch budget units. Included in such forms shall be a section requiring budget units to identify the amount of funds to be spent on agency publications.

On or before August 15 of each odd-numbered year, each of the state-administered retirement systems as defined by KRS 6.350(5) shall submit to the state budget director’s office and the Legislative Research Commission a preliminary projection of the actuarially required contribution rates payable for the budget biennium that begins in the following fiscal year.

On or before November 15 of each odd-numbered year, the state-administered retirement systems as defined by KRS 6.350(5) shall submit revised projections to the state budget director’s office and the Legislative Research Commission, based upon the most recently completed actuarial valuation, of the actuarially required contribution rates payable for the budget biennium that begins in the following fiscal year.

The Legislative Research Commission shall distribute the information received under this subsection to the committee staff and co-chairs of any committee that has jurisdiction over a state-administered retirement system.

On or before September 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall supply each branch of government with at least three (3) complete sets of the prescribed uniform forms and instructions for the preparation of estimates and statements, and one (1) copy of the complete statement of the expenditures of each budget unit of the branch to aid each branch of government in preparing its estimates and statements.

Upon request, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide such additional assistance to each branch of government as may be required.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 4, effective July 1, 1983; 1986, ch. 303, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2016 ch. 133, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

48.050.
Submission of budget unit requests.

The head of each budget unit shall submit its budget unit request to the Office of State Budget Director, in the case of the executive branch, to the Chief Justice, in the case of the judicial branch, to the director of the Legislative Research Commission, in the case of the legislative branch; and to the Legislative Research Commission, not later than November 15 of each odd-numbered year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 5, effective July 1, 1983; 2009, ch. 78, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

48.060.
Governor-elect and statewide constitutional officers-elect to be informed.

The Governor-elect shall receive all budget unit requests and supporting documentation for the executive branch no later than November 10, of the year of his election. He and those persons named by him shall be entitled to participate in the budget making process for the executive branch.

Any statewide constitutional officers-elect shall, upon request, receive all budget requests and supporting documentation relating to their offices.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 6, effective July 1, 1983.